District of Columbia statutes.
47-111

Disbursing Officer; appointment; bond; general powers and duties; audit of accounts.

(a)

The Disbursing Officer shall be appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and shall give bond to the United States in the sum of $50,000, for the benefit of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and all persons interested conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his office in the disbursing and accounting, according to law, for all moneys of the United States and of the District of Columbia that may come into his hands, which bond shall be approved by the Mayor and the Secretary of the Treasury and be filed in the office of the Secretary of the Treasury; provided, that advances in money shall be made, on the requisition of the Mayor, to the said Disbursing Officer instead of to the Mayor, and he shall account for the same as required by § 47-409. Said Disbursing Officer shall be subordinate to the Mayor, and he shall in every respect be responsible to the United States, the District of Columbia, and to individuals for the acts and doings of said Disbursing Officer.

(b)

The Disbursing Officer is authorized to pay laborers and employees of the District of Columbia, and such payments shall be made upon payrolls or other vouchers audited and approved by the Auditor of the District of Columbia, and certified by the Mayor as required by § 47-409. Said payrolls and other vouchers shall be included in the account of the Mayor.

(c)

The accounts of the Disbursing Officer shall be audited by the Auditor of the District of Columbia, who shall promptly forward the same to the Mayor for his approval.

History

Mar. 3, 1891, 26 Stat. 1064, ch. 546
July 14, 1892, 27 Stat. 151, ch. 171
June 30, 1898, 30 Stat. 526, ch. 540
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-111.
1973 Ed., § 47-112.

Mayor's Orders

Deputy Mayor for Office of Financial Management established: See Mayor’s Order 83-19, January 3, 1983.

Editor's Notes

Disbursing Office abolished: The Disbursing Office was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 3 of the Board of Commissioners, dated August 28, 1952, established under the direction and control of the Board of Commissioners a Department of General Administration headed by a Director. The Order transferred to the Director of General Administration all of the functions of the abolished Office. Reorganization Order No. 20 established the Finance Office in the Department of General Administration. Included in the Finance Office were an Office of the Assessor, the Office of the Collector of Taxes, the Disbursing Office, and the Accounting Office headed by an Accounting Officer. The function of approving vouchers and requisitions was delegated to the Accounting Officer by that Order. Reorganization Order No. 20 was replaced by Organization Order No. 121. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Reorganization Order No. 3 and Organization Order No. 121 were revoked by Organization Order No. 3 of the Commissioner of the District of Columbia, dated December 13, 1967. Organization Order No. 3 established within the newly created Department of General Administration a Finance Office and prescribed the functions thereof. These functions were subsequently transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. Functions pertaining to centralized accounting (including approving vouchers and requisitions) as set forth in that Order were transferred to the Director of the Office of Budget and Financial Management by Organization Order No. 30, dated April 5, 1972. The Office of Budget and Financial Management was replaced by Organization Order 50, dated December 31, 1974, which Order established the Office of Budget and Management Systems. The disbursing and accounting functions of the Office of Budget and Management Systems were replaced by Mayor’s Order 79-6, dated January 2, 1979, which Order established the Office of Financial Management. The Office of Financial Management was then re-established by 47-314 on March 5, 1981.